Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska82-322
Nebraska Arts Council; promulgate rules and regulations.

The Nebraska Arts Council shall promulgate rules and regulations, as necessary, to carry out the provisions of sections 82-317 to 82-329, 85-106 to 85-106.03, and 85-304 to 85-304.03.

Laws 1978, LB 664, § 6.